Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Sex Offender Registration; Law Enforcement Notification

§ 5401.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Address” means the actual location of the sex offender’s dwelling, including the street address, if any.

“Department” means the Department of Public Safety.

“Local law enforcement agency” means the municipal police department or statutorily established college or university police department. If the municipality, college, or university has no police department, the law enforcement agency that serves the municipality, college, or university.

“Mental abnormality” means a congenital or acquired condition that affects the emotional or volitional capacity of a person in a manner that predisposes the person to the commission of criminal sexual acts to a degree that makes the person a menace to the health and safety of other persons.

“Minor” means a person under the age of 18 years.

“Personality disorder” means a condition where a person exhibits personality traits that are inflexible and maladaptive and cause either significant functional impairment or subjective distress.

“Predatory” means an act directed at a stranger, or a person with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization.

“Release” means release from confinement or custody or placement into the community for any reason, including release on bail pending appeal, probation, parole, furlough, work release, early release, alternative sanctions, house arrest, daily interrupt, community placement, or completion of sentence. It shall also mean probation or parole supervision of an out-of-state sex offender under an interstate agreement or compact.

“Registry” means the Sex Offender Registry maintained by the Department of Public Safety.

“Sex offender” means:

A person who is convicted in any jurisdiction of the United States, including a state, territory, commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or military, federal, or tribal court of any of the following offenses:

sexual assault as defined in section 3252 of this title;

aggravated sexual assault as defined in section 3253 of this title;

lewd and lascivious conduct as defined in section 2601 of this title;

sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult as defined in section 1379 of this title;

second or subsequent conviction for voyeurism as defined in subsection 2605(b) or (c) of this title;

kidnapping with intent to commit sexual assault as defined in subdivision 2405(a)(1)(D) of this title;

aggravated sexual assault of a child in violation of section 3253a of this title;

human trafficking in violation of subdivisions 2652(a)(1)-(4) of this title;

aggravated human trafficking in violation of subdivision 2653(a)(4) of this title;

a federal conviction in federal court for any of the following offenses:

sex trafficking of children as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 1591;

aggravated sexual abuse as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2241;

sexual abuse as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2242;

sexual abuse of a minor or ward as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2243;

abusive sexual contact as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2244;

offenses resulting in death as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2245;

sexual exploitation of children as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2251;

selling or buying of children as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2251A;

material involving the sexual exploitation of minors as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2252;

material containing child pornography as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2252A;

production of sexually explicit depictions of a minor for import into the United States as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2260;

transportation of a minor for illegal sexual activity as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2421;

coercion and enticement of a minor for illegal sexual activity as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2422;

transportation of minors for illegal sexual activity, travel with the intent to engage in illicit sexual conduct with a minor, and engaging in illicit sexual conduct in foreign places as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2423;

transmitting information about a minor to further criminal sexual conduct as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2425;

trafficking in persons as defined in 18 U.S.C. sections 2251-2252(a), 2260, or 2421-2423 if the violation included sexual abuse, aggravated sexual abuse, or the attempt to commit aggravated sexual abuse; and

an attempt to commit any offense listed in this subdivision (A).

A person who is convicted of any of the following offenses against a victim who is a minor, except that, for purposes of this subdivision, conduct that is criminal only because of the age of the victim shall not be considered an offense for purposes of the Registry if the perpetrator is under the age of 18 and the victim is at least 12 years old:

any offense listed in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (10);

kidnapping as defined in subdivision 2405(a)(1)(D) of this title;

lewd and lascivious conduct with a child as defined in section 2602 of this title;

slave traffic as defined in section 2635 of this title;

sexual exploitation of children as defined in chapter 64 of this title;

procurement or solicitation as defined in subdivision 2632(a)(6) of this title;

aggravated sexual assault of a child as defined in section 3253a of this title;

sex trafficking of children or sex trafficking by force, fraud, or coercion as defined in section 2652 of this title;

sexual exploitation of a minor as defined in section 3258 of this title;

an attempt to commit any offense listed in this subdivision (B).

A person who takes up residence within this State, other than within a correctional facility, and who has been convicted in any jurisdiction of the United States, including a state, territory, commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or military, federal, or tribal court, for a sex crime the elements of which would constitute a crime under subdivision (A) or (B) of this subdivision (10) if committed in this State.

A person 18 years of age or older who resides in this State, other than in a correctional facility, and who is currently or, prior to taking up residence within this State, was required to register as a sex offender in any jurisdiction of the United States, including a state, territory, commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or military, federal, or tribal court; except that, for purposes of this subdivision, conduct that is criminal only because of the age of the victim shall not be considered an offense for purposes of the registry if the perpetrator is under the age of 18 and the victim is at least 12 years old.

A nonresident sex offender who crosses into Vermont and who is employed, carries on a vocation, or is a student.

“Sexually violent offense” means sexual assault or aggravated sexual assault, as described in sections 3252 and 3253 of this title, or a comparable offense in another jurisdiction of the United States, or any attempt to commit sexual assault, aggravated sexual assault, or a comparable offense in another jurisdiction of the United States.

“Sexually violent predator” means a person who is a sex offender, who has been convicted of a sexually violent offense, as defined in subdivision (11) of this section, and who suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder that makes the person likely to engage in predatory sexually violent offenses.

“Employed, carries on a vocation” includes employment that is full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding 14 days or for an aggregate period of time exceeding 30 days during any calendar year, whether financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of governmental or educational benefit.

“Student” means a person who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis in any public or private educational institution in Vermont, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher learning.

“Conviction” means a judgment of guilt following a verdict or finding of guilt, a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, an Alford Plea, or a judgment of guilt pursuant to a deferred sentence.
(15) (A) “Conviction” means a judgment of guilt following a verdict or finding of guilt, a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, an Alford Plea, or a judgment of guilt pursuant to a deferred sentence.

A sex offender whose sentence is deferred shall have no duty to register unless:

the offender violates the terms of the deferred sentence agreement and is sentenced on the conviction, in which case the offender’s name shall remain on the Registry for the period of time required by subsection 5407(e) or (f) of this title; or

the court finds that the interests of justice warrant placing the offender’s name on the Registry while the sentence is deferred, in which case the offender’s name shall be removed from the Registry upon his or her successful completion of the deferred sentence agreement.

A sex offender treated as a youthful offender pursuant to 33 V.S.A. chapter 52A shall have no duty to register unless the offender’s youthful offender status is revoked and he or she is sentenced for the offense in the Criminal Division of Superior Court.

“Risk” means the degree of dangerousness that a sex offender poses to others. “High-risk” means a high degree of dangerousness that a sex offender poses to others. Dangerousness includes the probability of a sexual reoffense.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 1997, No. 57, § 7, eff. June 26, 1997; 2001, No. 49, § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; 2003, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2005, No. 79, § 5; 2005, No. 83, § 3; 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 26, 2006; 2009, No. 1, § 13b, eff. March 4, 2009; 2009, No. 58, § 6; 2011, No. 31, § 1, eff. May 17, 2011; 2011, No. 55, § 9; 2015, No. 31, § 1; 2017, No. 15, § 1, eff. May 1, 2017; 2017, No. 72, § 1.

Particular cases.

Defendant, who pleaded nolo contendere to lewd or lascivious conduct with a child, was exempt from sex offender registration. The victim’s age was the reason the conduct was criminal, and defendant was under 18 and the victim at least 12 at the time at the time of the conduct in question. State v. Stamper, 2011 VT 18, 189 Vt. 583, 15 A.3d 142, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 20 (2011).

§ 5402.
Sex Offender Registry.

The Department of Public Safety shall establish and maintain a Sex Offender Registry, that shall consist of the information required to be filed under this subchapter.

All information contained in the Registry may be disclosed for any purpose permitted under the law of this State, including use by:

local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies exclusively for lawful law enforcement activities;

state and federal governmental agencies for the exclusive purpose of conducting confidential background checks;

any employer, including a school district, who is authorized by law to request records and information from the Vermont Criminal Information Center, where such disclosure is necessary to protect the public concerning persons required to register under this subchapter. The identity of a victim of an offense that requires registration shall not be released;

a person identified as a sex offender in the Registry for the purpose of reviewing the accuracy of any record relating to him or her. The identity of a victim of an offense that requires registration shall not be released; and

probate courts for purposes of conducting checks on persons applying for changes of name under 15 V.S.A. § 811.

The Departments of Corrections and of Public Safety shall adopt rules, forms and procedures under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 1999, No. 152 (Adj. Sess.), § 78a, eff. May 29, 2000; 2001, No. 49, § 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; 2009, No. 58, § 13.

§ 5403.
Reporting to Department of Public Safety.

Upon conviction and prior to sentencing, the court shall order the sex offender to provide the court with the following information, which the court shall forward to the Department forthwith:

name;

date of birth;

current address;

Social Security number;

current employment; and

name and address of any postsecondary educational institution at which the sex offender is enrolled as a student.

Within 14 days after sentencing, the court shall forward to the Department:

the sex offender’s conviction record, including offense, date of conviction, sentence, and any conditions of release or probation; and

an order issued pursuant to section 5405a of this title, on a form developed by the Court Administrator, that the defendant comply with Sex Offender Registry requirements.

The Departments of Corrections and of Public Safety shall jointly develop a process for the Department of Corrections to notify the Department of Public Safety when an offender who is under Department of Corrections supervision is required to be placed on the Sex Offender Registry because of a conviction that occurred in another jurisdiction of the United States, including a state, territory, commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or military, federal, or tribal court. The report shall include the offense of which the defendant was convicted that requires the placement of his or her name on the Registry.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2003, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 3; 2015, No. 31, § 2; 2017, No. 11, § 26.

§ 5404.
Reporting upon release from confinement or supervision.

Upon receiving a sex offender from the court on a probationary sentence or supervised community sentence and prior to releasing a sex offender from a correctional facility to serve probation, parole, furlough, or a supervised community sentence, the Department of Corrections shall forward to the Department the following information concerning the sex offender:

an update of the information listed in subsection 5403(a) of this title;

the address upon release and whether the offender will be living with a child under 18 years of age;

the name, address, and telephone number of the probation and parole office in charge of monitoring the sex offender; and

documentation of any treatment or counseling received.

As part of planning for the release of a sex offender from a correctional facility to the community upon completion of the offender’s maximum sentence, the Department of Corrections shall notify the offender of his or her obligation to report to the Department to register as a sex offender in compliance with section 5407 of this chapter prior to the offender’s scheduled release date. The Department of Corrections shall assist the offender with registration as a sex offender and advise the offender that failure to register with the Department prior to release is a crime subject to section 5409 of this chapter.

The Department of Corrections shall notify the Department of Public Safety within 24 hours of the time a sex offender changes his or her address or place of employment, or enrolls in or separates from any postsecondary educational institution, or begins residing with a child under 18 years of age. In addition, the Department of Corrections shall provide the Department with any updated information requested by the Department.

With respect to a sex offender residing with a child under 18 years of age under circumstances enumerated in subsection (a) or (c) of this section, the Department of Corrections shall communicate with the Department for Children and Families. If placement in a home with a child is being considered by the Department of Corrections, the Department of Corrections shall notify the Department for Children and Families, and the departments shall work together to determine whether such a placement is appropriate. If the Department of Corrections does not have a role in the placement of the offender in the community, but knows the offender will be residing with a person under 18 years of age, the Department of Corrections shall notify the Department for Children and Families at least 24 hours prior to releasing the offender from confinement.

The information required to be provided by subsection (a) of this section shall also be provided by the Department of Corrections to a sex offender’s parole or probation officer within three days of the time a sex offender is placed on probation or parole by the court or the Parole Board.

If it has not been previously submitted, upon receipt of the information to be provided to the Department pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Department shall immediately transmit the conviction data and fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2001, No. 49, § 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; 2003, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 2009, No. 1, § 14; 2015, No. 1, § 1, eff. Feb. 25, 2015.

§ 5405.
Court determination of sexually violent predators.

The General Assembly finds that some sexual offenders should be subject to increased sex offender registry and community notification procedures. It is the intent of the General Assembly that State’s Attorneys utilize the provisions in this section to petition the court to designate those offenders who pose a greater risk to the public as sexually violent predators to ensure that those offenders will be required to register as sex offenders for life, and that they will be among those offenders who are included on the State’s Internet Sex Offender Registry.

Within 15 days after the conviction of a sex offender, the State may file a petition with the court requesting that the person be designated as a sexually violent predator.

The determination of whether a person is a sexually violent predator shall be made by the court at the time of sentencing.

The court shall order a presentence investigation that shall include a psychosexual evaluation of the offender.

In making a determination of whether the person is a sexually violent predator, the court shall examine the following:

the person’s criminal history;

any testimony presented at trial, including expert testimony as to the person’s mental state;

the person’s history of treatment for a personality disorder or mental abnormality connected with his or her criminal sexual behavior;

any mitigating evidence, including treatment history, evidence of modified behavior, or expert testimony, that the convicted sex offender wishes to provide to the court prior to the determination; and

any other relevant evidence.

The standard of proof when the court makes such a determination shall be clear and convincing evidence that the convicted sex offender suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder that makes the person likely to engage in predatory sexually violent offenses.

The court shall determine whether the offender was eligible to be charged as a habitual offender as provided in section 11 of this title or a violent career criminal as provided in section 11a of this title and shall make findings as to such.

After making its determinations, the court shall issue a written decision explaining the reasons for its determinations and provide a copy of the decision to the Department within 14 days.

A person who is determined to be a sexually violent predator shall be subject to sex offender lifetime registration and community notification and inclusion on the Internet Sex Offender Registry as provided in this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2001, No. 49, § 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; 2005, No. 79, § 8; 2017, No. 11, § 27.

§ 5405a.
Court determination of Sex Offender Registry requirements.

The court shall determine at sentencing whether Sex Offender Registry requirements apply to the defendant.
(a) (1) The court shall determine at sentencing whether Sex Offender Registry requirements apply to the defendant.

If the State and the defendant do not agree as to the applicability of Sex Offender Registry requirements to the defendant, the State shall file a motion setting forth the Sex Offender Registry requirements applicable to the defendant within 14 days of the entry of a guilty plea. To the extent the defendant opposes the motion, the State and the defendant shall present evidence at the sentencing as to the applicability of Sex Offender Registry requirements to the defendant.

The court shall consider the following when determining under this section whether Sex Offender Registry requirements apply to the defendant:

the report issued pursuant to subsection 5403(c) of this title;

the presentence investigation report regarding the offense for which the defendant is being sentenced;

the court’s own judgment of conviction and any evidence that was presented at trial; and

any other evidence admitted at sentencing and deemed relevant by the court to the defendant’s Registry status.

The State shall bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence the applicability of Sex Offender Registry requirements to the defendant under this section.

Within 14 days after the sentencing or the presentation of evidence pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the court shall issue an order determining whether Sex Offender Registry requirements apply to the defendant. The order shall include:

the offense of which the defendant was convicted that requires the placement of his or her name on the Sex Offender Registry;

any prior convictions that affect:

the defendant’s Sex Offender Registry Status;

the length of time that the defendant is required to register as a sex offender; or

whether information regarding the defendant is required to be electronically posted on the Internet under section 5411a of this title;

the length of time that the defendant is required to register as a sex offender;

whether the defendant is designated as a sexually violent predator under section 5405 of this title;

whether the defendant was immediately released or remanded to the custody of the Department of Corrections; and

whether information regarding the defendant is required to be electronically posted on the Internet under section 5411a of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 31, § 3; amended 2017, No. 11, § 28.

§ 5406.
Department of Corrections duty to provide notice.

Upon receiving a sex offender from the court on a probationary sentence or any alternative sentence under community supervision by the Department of Corrections, or upon the release of a sex offender from a correctional facility, the Department of Corrections shall do each of the following:

inform the sex offender of the duty to register and keep the registration current as provided in section 5407 of this title;

inform the sex offender that if the sex offender changes residence to another state, the sex offender shall notify the Department of the new address and shall also register with the designated law enforcement agency in the new state not later than three days after establishing residence in the new state, if the new state has a registration requirement;

require the sex offender to read and sign a form stating that the duty of the sex offender to register under this section has been explained and is understood. The registration form shall be sent to the Department without delay; and

inform the sex offender that if he or she crosses into another state for purposes of employment, carrying on a vocation, or being a student, the sex offender must notify the Department of the new address, and shall register with the designated law enforcement agency in the other state, if the other state has a registration requirement.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2001, No. 49, § 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

§ 5407.
Sex offender’s responsibility to report.

Except as provided in section 5411d of this title, a sex offender shall report to the Department as follows:

if convicted of a registry offense in another state, within 10 days after either establishing residence in this State or crossing into this State for purposes of employment, carrying on a vocation, or being a student, the sex offender shall provide the information listed in subsection 5403(a) of this title;

annually within 10 days after the registrant’s birthday, or if a person is determined to be a sexually violent predator, that person shall report to the Department every 90 days;

within three days after any change of address, or if a person is designated as a high-risk sex offender pursuant to section 5411b of this title, that person shall report to the Department within 36 hours, and shall report whether a child under the age of 18 resides at such address;

within three days after the registrant enrolls in or separates from any postsecondary educational institution;

within three days after any change in place of employment;

within three days of any name change;

within three days of a child under 18 years of age moving into the residence of the registrant;

within 24 hours of being released from probation, parole, furlough, or a supervised community sentence; and

prior to the offender’s scheduled release date from a correctional facility to the community and if the offender is not subject to probation, furlough, or a community sentence upon release that requires supervision by the Department of Corrections.

If a sex offender changes residence to another state, or crosses into another state for purposes of employment, carrying on a vocation, or being a student, the sex offender shall notify the Department of the new address and shall also register with the designated law enforcement agency in the new state not later than three days after establishing residence in the new state, if the new state has a registration requirement.

Upon a sex offender’s change of residence to another state, the Department shall immediately notify the designated law enforcement agency in the new state, if the new state has a registration requirement.

The report required by this section shall include the information required by sections 5403 and 5404 of this chapter.

Except as provided for in subsection (f) of this section, a person required to register as a sex offender under this subchapter shall continue to comply with this section, except during periods of incarceration, until 10 years have elapsed since the person was released from prison or discharged from parole, supervised release, or probation, whichever is later. The 10-year period shall not be affected or reduced in any way by the actual duration of the offender’s sentence as imposed by the court, nor shall it be reduced by the sex offender’s release on parole or ending of probation or other early release.

A person required to register as a sex offender under this subchapter shall continue to comply with this section for the life of that person, except during periods of incarceration, if that person:

has at least one prior conviction for an offense described in subdivision 5401(10) of this subchapter or a comparable offense in another jurisdiction of the United States;

has been convicted of a sexual assault as defined in section 3252 of this title or aggravated sexual assault as defined in section 3253 of this title, or a comparable offense in another jurisdiction of the United States, including a state, territory, commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or military, federal, or tribal court; however, if a person convicted under section 3252 is not more than six years older than the victim of the assault and if the victim is 14 years of age or older, then the offender shall not be required to register for life if the age of the victim was the basis for the conviction;

has been determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to section 5405 of this title; or

has been designated as a noncompliant high-risk sex offender pursuant to section 5411d of this title.

The Department shall adopt forms and procedures for the purpose of verifying the addresses of persons required to register under this subchapter in accordance with the requirements set forth in Section (b)(3) of the Jacob Wetterling Crimes Against Children and Sexually Violent Offender Registration Act. Every 90 days for sexually violent predators and annually for other registrants, the Department shall verify addresses of registrants by sending a nonforwardable address verification form to each registrant at the address last reported by the registrant. The registrant shall be required to sign and return the form to the Department within 10 days of receipt. If the registrant’s name appears on the list of address verification forms automatically generated by the Registry, it shall be deemed that the sex offender has received that form.

A registrant who has no permanent address shall report to the Department to notify it as to his or her temporary residence. Temporary residence, for purposes of this section, need not include an actual dwelling or numbered street address, but shall identify a specific location. A registrant shall not be required to check in daily if he or she makes acceptable other arrangements with the Department to keep his or her information current. The Department may enter into an agreement with a local law enforcement agency to perform this function, but shall maintain responsibility for compliance with this subsection.

If the Department is notified by an offender that he or she is living with a child under the age of 18, the Department shall notify the Department for Children and Families within three days.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2001, No. 49, § 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; 2003, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 5; 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. May 26, 2006; 2007, No. 77, § 7, eff. June 7, 2007; 2009, No. 1, § 15; 2009, No. 58, § 7; 2015, No. 1, § 2, eff. Feb. 25, 2015; 2015, No. 31, § 4.

§ 5408.
Record of addresses; arrest warrant.

The Department shall maintain a record of the addresses of all sex offenders. The record shall be updated at least every three months. At any time, if the Department is unable to verify the whereabouts and address of a sex offender subject to this subchapter, it shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency in writing that the sex offender’s whereabouts are unknown. The Department shall also send a copy of the notification to the State’s Attorney of the county in which the sex offender’s most recent address is located.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. May 26, 2006.

§ 5409.
Penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a sex offender who knowingly fails to comply with any provision of this subchapter shall:

Be imprisoned for not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both. A sentence imposed under this subdivision shall run consecutively to any sentence being served by the sex offender at the time of sentencing.

For the second or subsequent offense, be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. A sentence imposed under this subdivision shall run consecutively to any sentence being served by the sex offender at the time of sentencing.

A sex offender who knowingly fails to comply with any provision of this subchapter for a period of more than five consecutive days shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. A sentence imposed under this subsection shall run consecutively to any sentence being served by the sex offender at the time of sentencing.

It shall be presumed that every sex offender knows and understands his or her obligations under this subchapter.

An affidavit by the administrator of the Sex Offender Registry that describes the failure to comply with the provisions of this subchapter shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this subchapter.
(d) (1) An affidavit by the administrator of the Sex Offender Registry that describes the failure to comply with the provisions of this subchapter shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this subchapter.

Certified records of the sex offender registry shall be admissible into evidence as business records.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2001, No. 49, § 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. May 26, 2006; 2009, No. 58, § 8.

§ 5410.
Victim notification.

If requested by a victim, the Department shall promptly notify the victim of the initial registration of a sex offender and any time the sex offender changes address, where such disclosure is necessary to protect the victim or the public concerning a person required to register under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.